Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1911
Medicare upper payment limit, defined.

Medicare upper
payment limit means the limitation established by 42 C.F.R. 447.272 establishing
a maximum amount of payment for services under the medical assistance program
to nursing facilities, skilled nursing facilities, and hospitals.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 11.